Virginia statutes. Title 20. Domestic Relations.
Article 12.
Miscellaneous Provisions.

§§ 20-88.81, 20-88.82.

Repealed by Acts 2015, c. 727, cl. 2, effective April 15, 2015.

Editor's note.

- Former
§
20-88.81, pertaining to uniformity of application and construction, derived from 1994, c. 673; 2005, c. 754.

Former
§
20-88.82, pertaining to Uniform Interstate Family Support Act, derived from 1994, c. 673.